dictsource/rw_rules
// Kinyarwanda translation rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
 
.group a
	a	a

.group b
	b	B
     _) b       b
     m) b	b

.group c
	c	tS
	cy	kj

.group d
	d	d

.group e
	e	e

.group f
	f	f

.group g
	g	g
	g (e	J
	g (i	J

.group h
	h	h

.group i
	i	i

.group j
	j	dZ
	jy	Jj

.group k
	k	k
	k (e	c
	k (i	c

.group l
	l	l

.group m
	m	m
	mp	mh

.group n
	n	n
	n (g	N
	n (ge	n^
	n (gi	n^
	nk	Nx
	nt	nh
	ny	n^

.group o
	o	o

.group p
	p	p

.group q
	q	q

.group r
	r	*   // try **
     _) r	R	

.group s
	s	s
	sh	S
	shy	S;

.group t
	t	t

.group u
	u	u

.group v
	v	c

.group w
	w	w
     b) w	g

.group x
	x	ks
     _) x	z

.group y
	y	j

.group z
	z	z

.group
	$	dola*a  // just a guess
